Tennessee, session 114, HB2123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-121-101, is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) "Private residence" means a dwelling constructed for a single family or a
single unit of a multi-family dwelling that is owned, rented, or leased for the purpose of
temporary or permanent habitation and is not open to the public;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-121-105, is amended by
designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new
subsection:
(b) On and after July 1, 2027, all newly constructed and accepted private
residence elevators must be registered with the department no later than seven (7) days
after the date the private residence elevator is placed in service. Upon conveyance of
the real property on which a private residence elevator is located, the new owner must
notify the department of the change in ownership within sixty (60) days of the date of
conveyance.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-121-106(4), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(4) Required Inspections. The inspections required by subdivisions (1)-(3) are
required inspections. Subdivisions (2) and (3) do not apply to private residence
elevators;
HB2123
012267
- 1 -

SECTION 4. For the purpose of rule promulgation, this act takes effect upon becoming
a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect July 1, 2027,
the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012267